Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-1,112
Laws 2011, LB151, changes; applicability.

Cases pending
before the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Court on August 27, 2011, in which
a hearing on the merits has been held prior to such date shall not be affected
by the changes made in sections 48-125, 48-145.01, 48-155, 48-156, 48-170,
48-178, 48-180, 48-182, and 48-185 by Laws 2011, LB151. Any cause of action
not in suit on August 27, 2011, and any cause of action in suit in which a
hearing on the merits has not been held prior to such date shall follow the
procedures in such sections as amended by Laws 2011, LB151.

Laws 2011, LB151, § 15.

The hearing on a motion to enforce an award of compensation is the hearing on the merits referenced in this section. The hearing prior to the entry of the award is not the hearing on the merits referenced in this section. DeLeon v. Reinke Mfg. Co., 287 Neb. 419, 843 N.W.2d 601 (2014).